en: Turkey neck
fr: Cou de dinde

en: Frozen turkey neck
fr: Cou de dinde surgelé

en: Ground turkey meat
fr: Viande de dinde hachée

en: Frozen ground turkey meat
fr: Viande de dinde hachée surgelée

fr: viande de dinde sans peau
bg: Пуешко месо без кожа

en: Turkey offals
fr: Abats de dinde

en: Frozen turkey offals
fr: Abats de dinde surgelés

en: Turkey heart
fr: Coeur de dinde

en: Cooked turkey heart
fr: Coeur de dinde cuit

en: Turkey liver
fr: Foie de dinde

en: Cooked turkey liver
fr: Foie de dinde cuit

en: Turkey leg meat only
fr: cuisse de dinde sans peau

en: Pigeon, pigeon fresh meat
fr: Pigeons, viande de pigeon, pigeon
hr: Golub
it: Piccione
ja: 鳩肉
nl: Duifvlezen
zh: 鸽子, 鸽

en: Roasted pigeon meat, Baked pigeon meat
fr: Viande de pigeon rôtie, Viande de pigeon cuite au four

en: Frozen pigeon meat
fr: Viande de pigeon surgelée

en: Breaded turkey
fr: Dindes panées, Dinde panée
hr: Pohana purica
nl: Gepandeerde kalkoen

en: Capon
de: Kapaun
es: Capón
fr: Chapons, Chapon
hr: Kopun
it: Cappone
nl: Kapoen
pl: Kapłon
zh: 阉鸡

en: Baked capon meat and skin, Roasted capon meat and skin
fr: Chapon rôti avec viande et peau, Chapon cuit au four avec viande et peau

en: Geese, Goose, goose meat
fr: Oies, oie, viande d'oie
hr: Guske
ja: 雁の肉
nl: Ganzen
zh: 鹅, 鹅肉

en: goose meat with skin
fr: viande et peau d'oie